Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4402
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Risk Retention Act is to regulate the formation and operation of risk retention groups in this state formed under the federal Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986 and to regulate the operation of purchasing groups in this state formed under the federal Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 2.